Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1915
Department; emergency powers; injunction.

(1) Whenever the department finds that an emergency exists requiring immediate action to protect the physical well-being and safety of a child in a program, the department may, without notice or hearing, issue an order declaring the existence of such an emergency and requiring that such action be taken as the department deems necessary to meet the emergency. The order may include an immediate prohibition on the care of children by the licensee other than children of the licensee. An order under this subsection shall be effective immediately. Any person to whom the order is directed shall comply immediately, and upon application to the department, the person shall be afforded a hearing as soon as possible and not later than ten days after his or her application for the hearing. On the basis of such hearing the department shall continue to enforce such order or rescind or modify it.

(2) The department may petition the appropriate district court for an injunction whenever there is the belief that any person is violating the Child Care Licensing Act, an order issued pursuant to the act, or any rule or regulation adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act. It shall be the duty of each county attorney or the Attorney General to whom the department reports a violation to cause appropriate proceedings to be instituted without delay to ensure compliance with the act, rules, regulations, and orders.

Laws 1984, LB 130, § 8;

Laws 1987, LB 472, § 5;

Laws 1988, LB 1013, § 3;

Laws 1993, LB 510, § 3;

Laws 1995, LB 401, § 39;

Laws 1997, LB 310, § 12;

Laws 1999, LB 594, § 56;

Laws 2001, LB 213, § 2;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 78;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 504.